Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 14. Youth Suicide Prevention.

§ 32.1-73.7.
Department to be lead agency for youth suicide prevention.

With such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose, the Department, in consultation with the Department of Education, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, community services boards and behavioral health authorities, and local departments of health, shall have the lead responsibility for the youth suicide prevention program within the Commonwealth. This responsibility includes coordination of the activities of the agencies of the Commonwealth pertaining to youth suicide prevention in order to develop and carry out comprehensive youth suicide prevention strategies addressing public awareness, the promotion of health development, early identification, intervention and treatment, and support to survivors. The strategies shall be targeted to the specific needs of children and adolescents. The Department shall cooperate with federal, state and local agencies, private and public agencies, survivor groups and other interested persons in order to prevent youth suicide within the Commonwealth.

The provisions of this section shall not limit the powers and duties of other state agencies.

History.

2001, cc. 275, 291; 2003, c. 885; 2005, cc. 336, 434; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 7 provides: “That all current members of the collegial bodies whose terms have been modified by this act shall be eligible, if reappointed, to the full number of terms provided by this act regardless of prior service.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885 deleted “the Virginia Council on Coordinating Prevention” following “Abuse Services.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 336 and 434 are identical, and in the first paragraph, inserted “and behavioral health authorities” in the first sentence; in the second sentence, substituted “develop and carry out” for “develop a,” “prevention strategies addressing public awareness” for “prevention plan addressing,” and “intervention and treatment” for “crisis intervention”; substituted “strategies” for “plan” in the third sentence; substituted “persons” for “individuals” in the fourth sentence; and deleted the last sentence, which formerly read: “The Department shall report annually by December 1 of each year to the Governor and the General Assembly on its youth suicide prevention activities.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” near the beginning of the first sentence in the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).